District of Columbia statutes.
5-903

Preference in promotions.

When promotions are being made in the Departments, the holders of such medals shall be preferred to other members of said Departments, other things being equal.

Mar. 4, 1929, 45 Stat. 1556, ch. 696, § 3
1981 Ed., § 4-703.
1973 Ed., § 4-703.